Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1782.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3260 of Title 70, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. By July 31, 2028, and by July 31 each year thereafter, each
institution of higher education within The Oklahoma State System of
Higher Education shall electronically submit to the Oklahoma State
Regents for Higher Education the following information for the
preceding academic year:
1. The number of full-time faculty employed by the institution;
2. The number of full-time faculty members who have been
awarded tenure;

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1782 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

3. The number of part-time faculty including adjunct
instructors or employees; and
4. The number of graduate assistants employed by the
institution including the number of courses taught by each graduate
assistant.
B. By September 1, 2028, and by September 1 each year
thereafter, the State Regents shall electronically submit to the
Governor, the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, and the Speaker
of the House of Representatives the information submitted pursuant
to subsection A of this section.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 3213.1, as
amended by Section 2, Chapter 312, O.S.L. 2025 (70 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 3213.1), is amended to read as follows:
Section 3213.1. A. The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher
Education shall make educational program resources at institutions
in The Oklahoma State System of Higher Education available to the
people in the Ponca City area. This The program shall be known as
the University Center at Ponca City.
B. The State Regents shall draw upon the educational programs
of institutions best suited to provide the kind of educational
programs needed and shall, in pursuance of Article XIII-A of the
Oklahoma Constitution and appropriate statutes, set the standards of
education as they relate to the programs operated to assure that
credits earned by students will be fully accepted at institutions of
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1782 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

high er education to which the students may transfer the credit to
apply toward an educational study objective.
C. The State Regents may establish appropriate funds and
accounts, including a revolving fund, in the Office of Management
and Enterprise Services for servicing the fiscal operations of the
University Center at Ponca City. The funds and accounts shall be
subject to the direct supervision, management, and control of the
board of trustees created by subsection D of this section. The
people locally shall provide suitable physical plant accommodations
for the University Center at Ponca City.
D. There is hereby created a board of nine (9) trustees to be
appointed by the Governor by and with the consent of the Senate to
serve as the administrative agency for the University Center at
Ponca City. The board shall be a body corporate and shall adopt and
use an official seal. The board so created shall have the authority
to submit a budget annually to the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher
Education, administer monies budgeted by the State Regents, provide
educational facilities, recommend courses and programs to be offered
by participating institutions, select a chief executive officer
whose duties include the general coordination of approved programs
and services, and the selection of other appropriate nonteaching
personnel. The board of trustees is authorized to expend all monies
allocated to the University Center at Ponca City as may be necessary
to perform the duties and responsibilities imposed upon the board by
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1782 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

this section. For purposes of acquiring and taking title to real
and personal property from sources other than state appropriations,
the board is authorized to enter into contracts and to adopt rules
and regulations pertaining to such actions. The initial nine (9)
members shall serve their terms for the period to which originally
appointed, in numbered positions having dates of expiration
identical to the dates of expiration of the original appointments:
Position No. 1. The term of office of one member shall expire
on June 30, 2013, and each nine (9) years thereafter;
Position No. 2. The term of office of one member shall expire
on June 30, 2014, and each nine (9) years thereafter;
Position No. 3. The term of office of one member shall expire
on June 30, 2015, and each nine (9) years thereafter;
Position No. 4. The term of office of one member shall expire
on June 30, 2016, and each nine (9) years thereafter;
Position No. 5. The term of office of one member shall expire
on June 30, 2017, and each nine (9) years thereafter;
Position No. 6. The term of office of one member shall expire
on June 30, 2018, and each nine (9) years thereafter;
Position No. 7. The term of office of one member shall expire
on June 30, 2019, and each nine (9) years thereafter;
Position No. 8. The term of office of one member shall expire
on June 30, 2020, and each nine (9) years thereafter; and

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1782 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

Position No. 9. The term of office of one member shall expire
on June 30, 2021, and each nine (9) years thereafter.
The board shall organize and elect a chair, vice-chair vice
chair, and secretary annually.
E. The board of trustees may, except as provided for in
subsection F of this section, establish and maintain plans for
tenure and retirement of its employees and for payment of deferred
compensation of employees and may provide hospital and medical
benefits, accident, health, and life insurance and annuity contracts
for employees and pay for all or part of the cost with funds
available for payment of its operating expenses.
F. Beginning January 1, 2027, the board of trustees shall not
have the authority to establish and maintain plans for tenure of
employees hired January 1, 2027, and thereafter. The contract of
any employee hired on January 1, 2027, and thereafter shall not
exceed five (5) years.
G. The board may establish with the State Treasurer any
accounts as are necessary to operate retirement, deferred
compensation, or benefits plans for its employees. The accounts
shall be revolving funds not subject to fiscal year limitations.
Funds deposited in the accounts may be invested in any of the types
of instruments in which the State Treasurer is authorized by law to
invest.

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1782 SFLR Page 5
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 3305, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 3305. The Board of Regents of the University of
Oklahoma shall have the supervision, management, and control of the
University of Oklahoma and all its integral parts, of Cameron
University, and of Rogers State University and shall have the
following additional powers and duties:
(a) Adopt such rules and regulations as it deems necessary to
govern the University of Oklahoma, Cameron University, and Rogers
State University.
(b) Employ and fix the compensation and duties of such
personnel as it deems necessary, including architects, attorneys,
engineers, and other professional and technical persons, for its
operation and for the operation of the University of Oklahoma,
Cameron University, and Rogers State University. Any of such
personnel having custody of public funds or other public property
may be required to furnish corporate surety bonds in such amounts as
may be deemed necessary by the Board, payable to the State of
Oklahoma this state and conditioned upon a faithful accounting of
all such funds and property.
(c) Enter into contracts, purchase supplies, materials, and
equipment, and incur such other expenses as may be necessary to make
any of its powers effective.

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1782 SFLR Page 6
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

(d) Authorize officials of the University of Oklahoma, Cameron
University, and Rogers State University to act in its behalf in the
making of contracts, or in carrying out the powers conferred upon
it.
(e) Receive and make disposition of monies, grants, and
property from federal agencies, and administer the same in
accordance with federal requirements.
(f) Accept gifts of real and personal property, monies, and
other things, and use or dispose of the same in accordance with the
directions of the donors or grantors thereof.
(g) Direct the disposition of all monies appropriated by the
Legislature or by the Congress or derived from the sale of bonds or
received from any other source by the University of Oklahoma,
Cameron University, and Rogers State University.
(h) Acquire and take title to real and personal property in its
name, on behalf of the University of Oklahoma or any agency thereof,
on behalf of Cameron University, and on behalf of Rogers State
University and convey, exchange, or dispose of, or otherwise manage
or control, such property in the interest of the University of
Oklahoma or agency thereof, Cameron University, and Rogers State
University, including the granting of leases, permits, easements,
and licenses over or upon such real property. The Board shall have
the power to institute legal action in the name of the Board before
any court having jurisdiction of such actions. The Board shall have
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1782 SFLR Page 7
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

the custody and control of abstracts of title and instruments
affecting the ownership of or title to real property belonging to
the Board, and being held by the Board on behalf of the University
of Oklahoma or any agency thereof, on behalf of Cameron University,
and on behalf of Rogers State University.
(i) Have supervision and charge of the construction of all
buildings at the University of Oklahoma, Cameron University, and
Rogers State University.
(j) Determine the need for and cause to be constructed,
dormitories and other buildings, on a self-liquidating basis, at the
University of Oklahoma or any branch or facility thereof, at Cameron
University, and at Rogers State University.
(k) Establish and maintain plans for tenure, except as provided
for in subsection (o) of this section, and establish and maintain
plans for retirement of employees of the Board and of the University
of Oklahoma, Cameron University, and Rogers State University and for
payment of deferred compensation of such employees; and provide
hospital and medical benefits, accident, health, and life insurance,
and annuity contracts, for such employees and their dependents. The
Board may pay for all or a part of the cost thereof for employees,
with funds available for the operation of the institution. Amounts
payable by an employee for such insurance or annuity contracts may,
with the consent of the employee, be deducted from his or her
salary.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1782 SFLR Page 8
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

(l) Audit all accounts against the funds appropriated for the
use and maintenance of the University of Oklahoma, Cameron
University, and Rogers State University and the State Treasurer
shall issue his a warrant for the amount of all accounts, including
salaries and expenses of said the Board, which shall have been
audited and allowed by the Board of Regents and attested by the
President and Secretary of the University of Oklahoma, the President
of Cameron University, and the President of Rogers State University.
(m) Provide penalties and forfeitures by way of damages and
otherwise for the violation of rules and regulations of the Board,
which may be sued for and collected in the name of the Board before
any court having jurisdiction of such actions.
(n) Issue, on behalf of the University of Oklahoma, special and
limited obligations for purposes of such capital projects as the
Regents may deem to be proper.
(o) Beginning January 1, 2027, the Board shall not have the
authority to establish and maintain plans for tenure of employees
hired January 1, 2027, and thereafter. The contract of any employee
hired on January 1, 2027, and thereafter shall not exceed five (5)
years.
(p) Do all things necessary and convenient to carry out the
powers expressly granted to it by the Constitution and the laws of
the state, or to make the University of Oklahoma, Cameron
University, and Rogers State University effective for the purposes
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1782 SFLR Page 9
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

for which they are maintained and operated and the enumeration
herein of certain powers and immunities of the Board of Regents of
the University shall not be construed as in derogation or as a
limitation of the powers and immunities properly belonging to the
Board in the government of the University of Oklahoma, Cameron
University, and Rogers State University by virtue of Section 8,
Article XIII of the Constitution.
SECTION 4. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 3407.2, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 3407.2. A. The Board of Regents of Murray State
College shall consist of seven (7) members, including one member who
is a resident of Ardmore, Oklahoma, appointed by the Governor, by
and with the advice and consent of the Senate. The regular term of
each member shall be seven (7) years, except that the initial
appointments shall be for lesser terms so that the term of only one
member shall expire each year.
B. The Board of Regents of Murray State College shall be a body
corporate, and shall adopt and use an official seal. It shall
annually elect a chair, a vice-chair vice chair, and a secretary,
each of whom shall serve for a term of one (1) fiscal year and until
his or her successor is elected and qualified, and who shall perform
such duties as the Board directs. The Board shall adopt rules and
regulations as it deems necessary for the governing of the Board and
the discharge of its duties, and shall cause to be kept the minutes
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1782 SFLR Page 10
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

of a ll meetings and transactions considered at each meeting, in a
suitable book to be obtained and kept for such purpose. The Board
of Regents of Murray State College shall be the governing board of
the College and shall have the supervision and management thereof
and shall have the same powers and duties as governing boards of
other institutions in The Oklahoma State System of Higher Education,
and may do all things necessary or convenient to make the College
effective for the purpose for which it is operated.
C. Beginning January 1, 2027, the Board of Regents shall not
have the authority to establish and maintain plans for tenure of
employees hired January 1, 2027, and thereafter. The contract of
any employee hired on January 1, 2027, and thereafter shall not
exceed five (5) years.
SECTION 5. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 3412, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 3412. The Board of Regents for the Oklahoma
Agricultural and Mechanical Colleges shall have the supervision,
management, and control of Oklahoma State University, Panhandle
State University, Langston University, Connors State College, and
Northeastern Oklahoma Agricultural and Mechanical College; and shall
have the following additional powers and duties:
1. Adopt such rules and regulations as it deems necessary to
govern each of the institutions under its jurisdiction;

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1782 SFLR Page 11
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

2. Employ and fix the compensation and duties of such personnel
as it deems necessary, including architects, attorneys, engineers,
and other professional and technical persons deemed necessary by the
Board, for its operation and for the operation of the institutions
under its jurisdiction. Any of such personnel having custody of
public funds or other public property may be required to furnish
corporate surety bonds in such amounts as may be deemed necessary by
the Board, payable to the State of Oklahoma this state and
conditioned upon a faithful accounting of all such funds and
property;
3. Enter into contracts, purchase supplies, materials, and
equipment, and incur such other expenses as may be necessary to make
any of its powers effective;
4. Authorize officials at the several institutions under its
jurisdiction to act in its behalf in the making of contracts, or in
carrying out the powers conferred upon it;
5. Receive and make disposition of monies, grants, and property
from federal agencies, and administer the same in accordance with
federal requirements;
6. Accept gifts of real and personal property, money, and other
things, and use or dispose of the same in accordance with the
directions of the donors or grantors thereof;
7. Direct the disposition of all monies appropriated by the
Legislature or by the Congress or derived from the sale of bonds or
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1782 SFLR Page 12
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

rece ived from any other source by institutions under its
jurisdiction;
8. Acquire and take title to real and personal property in its
name, on behalf of any of the institutions under its jurisdiction,
and convey, exchange, or dispose of, or otherwise manage or control,
such property in the interest of such institutions, including the
granting of leases, permits, easements, and licenses over or upon
any such real property. The Board shall have the power to institute
any legal action in the name of the Board before any court having
jurisdiction of such actions. The Board shall have the custody and
control of abstracts of title and instruments affecting the
ownership of or title to real property belonging to the Board, and
being held by the Board on behalf of a particular state educational
institution;
9. Have supervision and charge of the construction of all
buildings at the institutions under its jurisdiction;
10. Determine the need for and cause to be constructed,
dormitories and other buildings, on a self-liquidating basis, at any
institution under its jurisdiction;
11. Establish and maintain plans for tenure, except as provided
for in paragraph 12 of this section, and establish and maintain
plans for retirement of employees of the Board and of the
institutions under its jurisdiction, and for payment of deferred
compensation of such employees; and provide hospital and medical
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1782 SFLR Page 13
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

bene fits, accident, health, and life insurance, and annuity
contracts, for such employees and their dependents. The Board may
pay for all or a part of the cost for employees thereof with funds
available for the operation of the institution. Amounts payable by
an employee for such insurance or annuity contracts may, with the
consent of the employee, be deducted from the employee’s salary;
12. Beginning January 1, 2027, the Board shall not have the
authority to establish and maintain plans for tenure of employees
hired January 1, 2027, and thereafter. The contract of any employee
hired on January 1, 2027, and thereafter shall not exceed five (5)
years;
13. The Board shall cause a complete inventory to be made of
all properties belonging to each of the agricultural colleges or
universities within the State of Oklahoma this state before the last
Monday in December, next preceding each biennial session of the
State Legislature, and accompanying the inventories shall be a
financial statement showing in detail the condition of all funds
appropriated for the use of the agricultural colleges and
experimental stations, also the money expended and the purposes for
which the same were expended and the condition of the institution;
and, the results of experiments carried on, together with their
recommendations concerning remedial legislation or rules for the
betterment of the institution;

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1782 SFLR Page 14
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

13. 14. The Board shall audit all accounts against the funds
appropriated for the use and maintenance of the Oklahoma State
University and the other state agricultural colleges, including
experimental stations, and the State Treasurer shall issue a warrant
for the amount of all accounts, including salaries and expenses;
14. 15. Provide penalties and forfeitures by way of damages and
otherwise for the violation of rules of the Board, which may be sued
for and collected in the name of the Board before any court having
jurisdiction of such actions;
15. 16. The Legislature further recognizes and confirms, that
the Oklahoma State University is an institution corporate under the
constitution Oklahoma Constitution and the statutes of Oklahoma this
state with full power and authority, acting through its
constitutional Board of Regents, to do all things necessary or
convenient to accomplish the corporate objects of the institution,
and the institution, acting through its constitutional Board of
Regents, is hereby recognized to be such public corporation and to
have such powers; and
16. 17. Issue, on behalf of Oklahoma State University, special
and limited obligations for purposes of such capital projects as the
Regents may deem to be proper.
Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the powers of
the board of regents Board of Regents to control and use monies
accruing to the institutions under their its jurisdiction and
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1782 SFLR Page 15
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

cont rol, from nontax sources, including institutional earnings, and
proceeds of sales of surplus properties heretofore authorized to be
sold, and revenues derived by way of bonuses and rentals from oil
and gas leases, for any lawful institutional purpose, is hereby
specifically confirmed.
The enumeration herein of certain powers and immunities of the
Board of Regents for the Oklahoma Agricultural and Mechanical
Colleges shall not be construed as in derogation or as a limitation
of other powers and immunities properly belonging to the Board by
virtue of any provisions of the Oklahoma Constitution of Oklahoma or
of any provision of law. The Board, is hereby, expressly granted
every power necessary or convenient to make institutions under its
jurisdiction effective for the purposes for which they were created
and are maintained and operated.
Nothing in this section shall be construed as in derogation of
the constitutional powers and responsibilities of the Board of
Regents for the Oklahoma Agricultural and Mechanical Colleges,
acting as the Board of Regents for Connors State College,
Northeastern Oklahoma Agricultural and Mechanical College, Panhandle
State University, and Langston University.
SECTION 6. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 3510, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 186, O.S.L. 2023 (70 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 3510), is amended to read as follows:

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1782 SFLR Page 16
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

Section 3510. The Board of Regents of Oklahoma Colleges, also
known as the Regional University System of Oklahoma (RUSO) pursuant
to Section 3507.1 of this title, shall have the supervision,
management, and control of the University of Central Oklahoma, East
Central University, Northeastern State University, Northwestern
Oklahoma State University, Southeastern Oklahoma State University,
and Southwestern Oklahoma State University;, and it shall have the
following additional powers and duties:
(a) Adopt such rules and regulations as it deems necessary to
govern each of the institutions under its jurisdiction.
(b) Employ and fix the compensation and duties of such
personnel as it deems necessary including architects, attorneys,
engineers, and other professional and technical persons for its
operation and for the operation of the institutions under its
jurisdiction. Any of such personnel having custody of public funds
or other public property may be required to furnish corporate surety
bonds in such amounts as may be deemed necessary by the Board,
payable to this state and conditioned upon a faithful accounting of
all such funds and property.
(c) Enter into contracts, purchase supplies, materials, and
equipment, and incur such other expenses as may be necessary to make
any of its powers effective.


SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1782 SFLR Page 17
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

(d) Authorize officials at the several institutions under its
jurisdiction to act in its behalf in the making of contracts, or in
carrying out the powers conferred upon it.
(e) Receive and make disposition of monies, grants, and
property from federal agencies, and administer the same in
accordance with federal requirements.
(f) Accept gifts of real and personal property, money, and
other things, and use or dispose of the same in accordance with the
directions of the donors or grantors thereof.
(g) Direct the disposition of all monies appropriated by the
Legislature or by the Congress or derived from the sale of bonds or
received from any other source by the institutions under its
jurisdiction.
(h) Acquire and take title to real and personal property in its
name, on behalf of any of the institutions under its jurisdiction,
and convey, exchange, or dispose of, or otherwise manage or control,
such property in the interest of such institutions including the
granting of leases, permits, easements, and licenses over or upon
any such real property. The Board shall have the power to institute
any legal action in the name of the Board before any court having
jurisdiction of such actions. The Board shall have custody of
abstracts of title and instruments affecting the ownership of or
title to real property acquired for or belonging to such
institutions.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1782 SFLR Page 18
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

(i) Have supervision and charge of the construction of all
buildings at institutions under its jurisdiction.
(j) Determine the need for and cause to be constructed
dormitories and other buildings, on a self-liquidating basis, at any
institution under its jurisdiction.
(k) Establish and maintain plans for tenure, except as provided
for in subsection (l) of this section, and establish and maintain
plans for retirement of employees of the Board and of the
institutions under its jurisdiction, and for payment of deferred
compensation of such employees; and provide hospital and medical
benefits, accident, health, and life insurance, and annuity
contracts, for such employees and their dependents. The Board may
pay for all or a part of the cost thereof for employees, with funds
available for the operation of the institution. Amounts payable by
an employee for such insurance or annuity contracts may, with the
consent of the employee, be deducted from his or her salary.
(l) Beginning January 1, 2027, the Board shall not have the
authority to establish and maintain plans for tenure of employees
hired January 1, 2027, and thereafter. The contract of any employee
hired on January 1, 2027, and thereafter shall not exceed five (5)
years.
(m) Maintain an inventory of all property belonging to each of
the institutions under its jurisdiction.

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1782 SFLR Page 19
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

(m) (n) Audit all accounts against the funds allocated to the
institutions under its jurisdiction.
(n) (o) Provide penalties and forfeitures by way of damages and
otherwise for the violation of rules and regulations of the Board,
which may be sued for and collected in the name of the Board before
any court having jurisdiction of such actions.
(o) (p) Do all things necessary or convenient to carry out the
powers expressly granted to it by Article XIII-B of the Oklahoma
Constitution and the Statutes of Oklahoma statutes of this state, or
to make institutions under its jurisdiction effective for the
purposes for which they are maintained or operated.
(p) (q) Issue, on behalf of the institutions supervised and
managed by RUSO, special and limited obligations for purposes of
such capital projects as RUSO may deem proper.
SECTION 7. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 3606, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 3606. The Board of Regents of the Oklahoma College of
Liberal Arts shall have the supervision, management, and control of
the Oklahoma College of Liberal Arts;, and it shall have the
following additional powers and duties:
(a) Adopt such rules and regulations as it deems necessary to
govern the Oklahoma College of Liberal Arts.
(b) Employ and fix the compensation and duties of such
personnel as it deems necessary, including architects, attorneys,
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1782 SFLR Page 20
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

engi neers, and other professional and technical persons for its
operation and for the operation of the Oklahoma College of Liberal
Arts. Any of such personnel having custody of public funds or other
public property may be required to furnish corporate surety bonds in
such amounts as may be deemed necessary by the Board, payable to the
State of Oklahoma this state and conditioned upon a faithful
accounting of all such funds and property.
(c) Enter into contracts, purchase supplies, materials, and
equipment, and incur such other expenses as may be necessary to make
any of its powers effective.
(d) Authorize officials at the Oklahoma College of Liberal Arts
to act in its behalf in the making of contracts, or in carrying out
the powers conferred upon it.
(e) Receive and make disposition of monies, grants, and
property from federal agencies, and administer the same in
accordance with federal requirements.
(f) Accept gifts of real and personal property, money, and
other things, and use or dispose of the same in accordance with the
directions of the donors or grantors thereof.
(g) Direct the disposition of all monies appropriated by the
Legislature or by the Congress or derived from the sale of bonds or
received from any other source by the Oklahoma College of Liberal
Arts.

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1782 SFLR Page 21
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

(h) Acquire and take title to real and personal property in its
name, on behalf of the Oklahoma College of Liberal Arts, and convey,
exchange, or dispose of, or otherwise manage or control, such
property in the interest of such institution, including the granting
of leases, permits, easements, and licenses over or upon any such
real property. The Board shall have the power to institute any
legal action in the name of the Board before any court having
jurisdiction of such actions. The Board shall have custody of
abstracts of title and instruments affecting the ownership of or
title to real property belonging to the Oklahoma College of Liberal
Arts.
(i) Have supervision and charge of the construction of all
buildings at the Oklahoma College of Liberal Arts.
(j) Determine the need for and cause to be constructed
dormitories and other buildings, on a self-liquidating basis, at the
Oklahoma College of Liberal Arts.
(k) Establish and maintain plans for tenure, except as provided
for in subsection (l) of this section, and establish and maintain
plans for retirement of employees at the Oklahoma College of Liberal
Arts, and for payment of deferred compensation of such employees;
and provide hospital and medical benefits, accident, health, and
life insurance, and annuity contracts, for such employees and their
dependents. The Board may pay for all or a part of the cost thereof
for employees, with funds available for the operation of the
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1782 SFLR Page 22
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

inst itution. Amounts payable by an employee for such insurance or
annuity contracts may with the consent of the employee be deducted
from his or her salary.
(l) Beginning January 1, 2027, the Board shall not have the
authority to establish and maintain plans for tenure of employees
hired January 1, 2027, and thereafter. The contract of any employee
hired on January 1, 2027, and thereafter shall not exceed five (5)
years.
(m) Maintain an inventory of all property belonging to the
Oklahoma College of Liberal Arts.
(m) (n) Audit all accounts against the funds allocated to the
Oklahoma College of Liberal Arts.
(n) (o) Provide penalties and forfeitures by way of damages and
otherwise for the violation of rules and regulations of the Board,
which may be sued for and collected in the name of the Board before
any court having jurisdiction of such actions.
(o) (p) Do all things necessary or convenient to carry out the
powers expressly granted to it, or to make the Oklahoma College of
Liberal Arts effective for the purposes for which it is maintained
or operated.
SECTION 8. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 3706, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 3706. The Board of Regents of the Northern Oklahoma
College shall have the supervision, management, and control of the
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1782 SFLR Page 23
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

Nort hern Oklahoma College;, and it shall have the following
additional powers and duties:
(a) Adopt such rules and regulations as it deems necessary to
govern the Northern Oklahoma College.
(b) Employ and fix the compensation and duties of such
personnel as it deems necessary, including architects, attorneys,
engineers, and other professional and technical persons for its
operation and for the operation of Northern Oklahoma College. Any
of such personnel having custody of public funds or other public
property may be required to furnish corporate surety bonds in such
amounts as may be deemed necessary by the Board, payable to the
State of Oklahoma this state and conditioned upon a faithful
accounting of all such funds and property.
(c) Enter into contracts, purchase supplies, materials, and
equipment, and incur such other expenses as may be necessary to make
any of its powers effective.
(d) Authorize officials at the Northern Oklahoma College to act
in its behalf in the making of contracts, or in carrying out the
powers conferred upon it.
(e) Receive and make disposition of monies, grants, and
property from federal agencies, and administer the same in
accordance with Federal requirements.


SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1782 SFLR Page 24
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

(f) Accept gifts of real and personal property, money, and
other things, and use or dispose of the same in accordance with the
directions of the donors or grantors thereof.
(g) Direct the disposition of all monies appropriated by the
Legislature or by the Congress or derived from the sale of bonds or
received from any other source by Northern Oklahoma College.
(h) Acquire and take title to real and personal property in its
name, on behalf of the Northern Oklahoma College, and convey,
exchange, or dispose of, or otherwise manage or control, such
property in the interest of such institution, including the granting
of leases, permits, easements, and licenses over or upon any such
real property. The Board shall have the power to institute any
legal action in the name of the Board before any court having
jurisdiction of such actions. The Board shall have custody of
abstracts of title and instruments affecting the ownership of or
title to real property belonging to the Northern Oklahoma College.
(i) Have supervision and charge of the construction of all
buildings at Northern Oklahoma College.
(j) Determine the need for and cause to be constructed
dormitories and other buildings, on a self-liquidating basis, at the
Northern Oklahoma College.
(k) Establish and maintain plans for tenure, except as provided
for in subsection (l) of this section, and establish and maintain
plans for retirement of employees at the Northern Oklahoma College,
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1782 SFLR Page 25
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

and for payment of deferred compensation of such employees; and
provide hospital and medical benefits, accident, health, and life
insurance, and annuity contracts, for such employees and their
dependents. The Board may pay for all or a part of the cost thereof
for employees with funds available for the operation of the
institution. Amounts payable by an employee for such insurance or
annuity contracts may, with the consent of the employee be deducted
from his or her salary.
(l) Beginning January 1, 2027, the Board shall not have the
authority to establish and maintain plans for tenure of employees
hired January 1, 2027, and thereafter. The contract of any employee
hired on January 1, 2027, and thereafter shall not exceed five (5)
years.
(m) Maintain an inventory of all property belonging to the
Northern Oklahoma College.
(m) (n) Audit all accounts against the funds allocated to
Northern Oklahoma College.
(n) (o) Provide penalties and forfeitures by way of damages and
otherwise for the violation of rules and regulations of the Board,
which may be sued for and collected in the name of the Board before
any court having jurisdiction of such actions.
(o) (p) Do all things necessary or convenient to carry out the
powers expressly granted to it, or to make the Northern Oklahoma

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1782 SFLR Page 26
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

Coll ege effective for the purposes for which it is maintained or
operated.
SECTION 9. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 4413, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 4413. A. The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher
Education shall have authority to establish a two-year community
college in Tulsa County to serve Tulsa County and surrounding area,
if provision is made locally for the donation, to the State of
Oklahoma, this state of a suitable site for the college, which shall
be known as the Tulsa Community College and shall be an integral
part of The Oklahoma State System of Higher Education;, and shall be
entitled to the same privileges and be subject to the same laws as
other member institutions of such State System.
B. After the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education have
acted to establish the Tulsa Community College, there shall be
created the Board of Regents of the Tulsa Community College, which
shall consist of seven (7) members, to be appointed by the Governor,
by and with the advice and consent of the Senate. Four members of
said Board shall be residents of Tulsa County. Appointments shall
be to numbered positions on the Board, and the terms of members of
the Board shall be as follows:
Position No. 1. The term of office of one member shall expire
on the 30th day of June, 1969, and each seven (7) years thereafter.

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1782 SFLR Page 27
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

Position No. 2. The term of office of one member shall expire
on the 30th day of June, 1970, and each seven (7) years thereafter.
Position No. 3. The term of office of one member shall expire
on the 30th day of June, 1971, and each seven (7) years thereafter.
Position No. 4. The term of office of one member shall expire
on the 30th day of June, 1972, and each seven (7) years thereafter.
Position No. 5. The term of office of one member shall expire
on the 30th day of June, 1973, and each seven (7) years thereafter.
Position No. 6. The term of office of one member shall expire
on the 30th day of June, 1974, and each seven (7) years thereafter.
Position No. 7. The term of office of one member shall expire
on the 30th day of June, 1975, and each seven (7) years thereafter.
Vacancies in positions on the Board shall be filled by the
Governor for the unexpired term, by and with the advice and consent
of the Senate. No member of the Board shall be employed upon any
work to be performed in connection with the Tulsa Community College,
nor shall any member of said the Board enter into any contract or
business transaction involving a financial consideration with the
Tulsa Community College. Each member of the Board of Regents of the
Tulsa Community College shall take and subscribe to the oaths
required of state officials generally. Each member of the Board
shall be allowed necessary travel expenses, as may be approved by
the Board, pursuant to the State Travel Reimbursement Act.

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1782 SFLR Page 28
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

C. The Board of Regents of the Tulsa Community College shall be
a body corporate, and shall adopt and use an official seal. It
shall annually elect a chairperson, a vice-chairperson vice
chairperson, and a secretary, each of whom shall serve for a term of
one (1) fiscal year and until his or her successor is elected and
qualified, and who shall perform such duties as the Board directs;
and each of whom shall furnish a corporate surety bond payable to
the State of Oklahoma this state, in such amount as the Board may
prescribe, conditioned upon the faithful performance of his or her
duties. The Board shall adopt rules as it deems necessary for the
governing of the Board and the discharge of its duties, and shall
cause to be kept the minutes of all meetings and transactions
considered at each meeting, in a suitable book to be obtained and
kept for such purpose. The Board of Regents of the Tulsa Community
College shall be the governing Board of the community college and
shall have the supervision and management thereof and shall have the
same powers and duties as governing boards of other institutions in
The Oklahoma State System of Higher Education and may do all things
necessary or convenient to make the community college effective for
the functions and purposes for which it shall have been established.
Following the establishment of the Tulsa Community College by the
Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education, the Board of Regents of
the college shall develop a comprehensive plan for implementing the
functions, purposes, and educational programs of the Tulsa Community
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1782 SFLR Page 29
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

Coll ege as prescribed by the State Regents in the establishment of
the institution, which plan shall be submitted for review and
approval of said the State Regents.
D. The name change from Tulsa Junior College to Tulsa Community
College shall not affect in any manner whatsoever any legal
relationships, bonds, contracts, supervisory authority by the Board
of Regents, title to property, obligations, or any other phase or
aspect of the legal status of the institution for any purpose,
except that the institution shall be referred to as the “Tulsa Tulsa
Community College” College in all future references to the
institution and in all constitutional and statutory references
currently in law.
E. Beginning January 1, 2027, the Board of Regents shall not
have the authority to establish and maintain plans for tenure of
employees hired January 1, 2027, and thereafter. The contract of
any employee hired on January 1, 2027, and thereafter shall not
exceed five (5) years.
F. It is the intent of the Legislature that supplies, including
but not limited to letterheads, which on the effective date of this
section carry or are labeled with the name “Tulsa Tulsa Junior
College” College shall be utilized after the effective date of this
section until such supplies are depleted. Any new supplies ordered
for use after the effective date of this section shall bear the name
“Tulsa Tulsa Community College” College. For purposes of this
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1782 SFLR Page 30
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

sect ion, “supplies” shall not mean signs designating the name of the
college.
SECTION 10. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 4418, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 4418. A. The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher
Education upon said finding of need and feasibility as provided in
Section 4417 of this title are directed to negotiate with the Board
of the now existing Altus Community College and make all appropriate
arrangements for the conversion of this the institution to a state
junior college, including the continued use of existing facilities,
faculty, and other resources for the period of time necessary to
achieve the conversion, and to maintain and operate the college
during the transition period. After the conversion has been fully
accomplished by the State Regents, a governing board composed of
seven (7) members to serve seven-year overlapping terms and to be
known as the Board of Regents of Western Oklahoma State College
shall be created to be appointed by the Governor by and with the
advice and consent of the Senate, which board. The Board shall have
the same powers and duties as the Board of Regents of Tulsa
Community College, set out provided for in Section 4413 of this
title. No more than four members of Advisory the Board shall be
residents of any one county involved.
B. Beginning January 1, 2027, the Board shall not have the
authority to establish and maintain plans for tenure of employees
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1782 SFLR Page 31
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

hire d January 1, 2027, and thereafter. The contract of any employee
hired on January 1, 2027, and thereafter shall not exceed five (5)
years.
SECTION 11. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 4423, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 4423. A. The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher
Education are hereby authorized and directed to maintain two-year
colleges at El Reno, which shall be known as the Redlands Community
College, at Poteau, which shall be known as the Carl Albert State
College, at Seminole, which shall be known as the Seminole State
College, at Midwest City, which shall be known as the Rose State
College, and in South Oklahoma City, which shall be known as the
Oklahoma City Community College; and, each of said the colleges
shall be an integral and full-fledged part of The Oklahoma State
System of Higher Education.
B. Each of the colleges which at the time it became a member of
the The Oklahoma State System of Higher Education was operating a
technical area school district program to carry out the function of
postsecondary technical education for the people of the district
shall continue to do so as then operated and in accordance with
Section 4410 of this title, and all property acquired by virtue of
the technical area school district operation shall remain as
property of the technical area school district and be maintained in
the custody of the Board of Regents of the college acting as the
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1782 SFLR Page 32
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

gove rning board of the technical area school district for use by the
postsecondary area district program.
C. For each of the colleges above named and identified provided
for in this section, there shall be created a separate Board of
Regents, and said each Board of Regents shall consist of seven (7)
members to serve seven-year overlapping terms, with members of said
each Board to be appointed by the Governor, by and with the advice
and consent of the State Senate. Each Board shall have the same
powers and duties as the Board of Regents of Tulsa Community
College. Four members of the Board of Regents for the colleges
located at El Reno, Poteau, and Seminole shall be from the county in
which said each college is located. Four members of the Board of
Regents for Rose State College shall be residents of the original
district of the college. Four members of the Board of Regents for
Oklahoma City Community College shall be residents of South Oklahoma
City. For purposes of this section, “South Oklahoma City” shall
mean the original district of Oklahoma City Community College and
the portion of Oklahoma City that lies in Cleveland County and is
bounded on the west by County Line Road and on the east by Bryant
Avenue.
D. With respect to Rose State College and Oklahoma City
Community College, it is further provided that the college and its
governing Board of Regents shall continue to operate the technical
area school district program to carry out the function of
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1782 SFLR Page 33
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

post secondary technical education for the people of the technical
education school district as now operated, and in accordance with
Section 4410 of this title.
E. Beginning January 1, 2027, the Board of Regents for each of
the colleges authorized by the provisions of this section shall not
have the authority to establish and maintain plans for tenure of
employees hired January 1, 2027, and thereafter. The contract of
any employee hired on January 1, 2027, and thereafter shall not
exceed five (5) years.
SECTION 12. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON EDUCATION
March 3, 2026 - DO PASS AS AMENDED













SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1782 SFLR Page 34
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)